Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1 Financial Disclosure
2-10-107. Content of statements — Closing out accounts — Reporting of in-kind contributions.

A statement filed under § 2-10-105 or § 2-10-106 shall consist of either:

A statement that neither the contributions received nor the expenditures made during the period for which the statement is submitted exceeded one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any statement filed pursuant to § 2-10-106 shall indicate whether an unexpended balance of contributions, continuing debts and obligations or an expenditure deficit exists; or

A statement setting forth, under contributions, a list of all the contributions received, including the full name, complete address, occupation, and employer of each person who contributed a total amount of more than one hundred dollars ($100) during the period for which the statement is submitted, and the amount contributed by that person;

When a candidate or the treasurer of a political campaign committee shows that best efforts have been used to obtain, maintain and submit the complete address, occupation, and employer required for contributors, the statement shall be considered in compliance with this subdivision (a)(2)(A). “Best efforts” includes notifying the contributor by first class mail that further information concerning such contributor is required under state law, or by including on a written solicitation for contributions a clear request for the contributor's name, address, occupation and employer and by accurately stating that such information is required under state law for all persons contributing more than one hundred dollars ($100). Further definitions and guidelines, if any, for what is also considered “best efforts” shall be set by rule promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1);

The statement of each candidate shall include the date of the receipt of each contribution and the statement of a political campaign committee shall include the date of each expenditure that is a contribution to a candidate. “Date of the receipt”, as used in this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(iii), means the date when the contribution was received by the candidate, candidate's committee, or treasurer. The statement shall list as a single item the total amount of contributions of one hundred dollars ($100) or less; and

A statement setting forth, under expenditures, a list of all expenditures made, including the full name and address of each person to whom a total amount of more than one hundred dollars ($100) was paid during the period for which the statement is submitted, the total amount paid to that person, and the purpose of the payment which shall clearly identify that it is an allowable expenditure under § 2-10-114. The words “reimbursement”, “credit card purchase”, “other” and “campaign expense” shall not be considered acceptable descriptions for “purpose”. Any purchase made with a credit card shall also be disclosed as a payment to the vendor providing the item or service. Credit card payments to separate vendors shall be disclosed as separate expenditures. The statement shall list the total amount of expenditures of one hundred dollars ($100) or less each, by category, without showing the exact amount of or vouching for each such expenditure.

When any candidate or political campaign committee desires to close out a campaign account, it may file a statement to such effect at any time; provided, that the statement shall on its face show no unexpended balance, continuing debts or obligations or deficit.

When filing a statement under § 2-10-105 or § 2-10-106, a contribution, as defined in § 2-10-102, for which no monetary consideration is paid or promised, referred to as an in-kind contribution in this part, shall be listed separately in the disclosure statement and excluded from the lists of contributions and expenditures. The in-kind contribution list shall include:

In-kind contributions of a value of one hundred dollars ($100) or less may be listed as a single item; and

In-kind contributions of a value of more than one hundred dollars ($100) during the period for which the statement is submitted, and for each such contribution, the category of the contribution, the name, address, occupation and employer of each person who contributed it.

When a candidate or the treasurer of a political campaign committee shows that best efforts have been used to obtain, maintain and submit the complete address, occupation, and employer required for contributors, the statement shall be considered in compliance with this subdivision (c)(1)(B). “Best efforts” includes notifying the contributor by first class mail that further information concerning such contributor is required under state law, or by including on a written solicitation for contributions a clear request for the contributor's name, address, occupation and employer and by accurately stating such information is required under state law for all persons contributing more than one hundred dollars ($100). Further definitions and guidelines, if any, for what is also considered “best efforts” shall be set by rule promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1).

The statement of each candidate shall include the date of the receipt of each in-kind contribution and the statement of a political campaign committee shall include the date of each expenditure that is an in-kind contribution to a candidate.

Within ninety (90) days of February 15, 2006, by rule promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the registry of election finance shall enumerate a nonexclusive listing of examples of the various categories of contributions that constitute “in-kind contributions” requiring disclosure. Upon promulgating such rule, the registry shall provide a copy of such rule to each member of the general assembly and each qualified candidate for state office. Any changes or revisions to the rules shall be promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1).

An in-kind contribution is deemed to be made and shall be reportable in the period when such contribution is made or performed and not when the cost is billed or paid. The actual cost of the in-kind contribution, if known, shall be reported in the period such contribution is made or performed. If the actual cost of the in-kind contribution is not known, an estimate of the cost shall be reported in the period such contribution is made or performed, and the report shall indicate that the amount reported is estimated. If the actual cost, as indicated on the bill, is different from the amount reported, such amount shall be amended or adjusted on a later report covering the period in which payment is made.

A statement filed under § 2-10-105 or § 2-10-106 shall also list any unexpended balance, any deficit and any continuing financial obligations of the candidate, campaign or committee.

Payments to a person as reimbursement for expenditures made by the person on behalf of the candidate or committee shall be disclosed as payments to the vendor who provided the item or service to the candidate or committee, not the person who is reimbursed.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 8; 1984, ch. 683, § 6; 1986, ch. 780, § 2; 1989, ch. 585, §§ 15, 33; 1990, ch. 943, § 3; 1991, ch. 519, §§ 5, 6; 1995, ch. 531, §§ 14, 15; 1997, ch. 410, §§ 3, 4; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4; 2009, ch. 556, §§ 2-4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 17 provided that the amendment by that act shall only apply to contributions and expenditures made after January 1, 1996.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Ethical Requirements for Judicial Candidates (Joe G. Riley), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 12 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Independent election expenditures, OAG 96-90 (7/24/96).

Application of campaign finance legislation to limited liability companies, OAG 99-086 (4/8/99).

2-10-108. Sworn complaint on statements of candidates — Penalty for false complaint.

A registered voter of Tennessee may file a sworn complaint alleging that a statement filed regarding an election for which that voter was qualified to vote does not conform to law or to the truth or that a person has failed to file a statement required by law.

All sworn complaints on a statement of a candidate for state public office or a political campaign committee for such candidate must be filed in the office of the registry of election finance.

All sworn complaints on a statement of a candidate for local public office or a political campaign committee for such candidate must be filed in the office of the district attorney general who represents the judicial district in which the voter resides.

Any person who knowingly and willfully files a sworn complaint which is false or for the purpose of harassment is subject to the civil penalties enacted into law by Acts 1989, ch. 585, and is liable for reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the candidate who was the subject of such complaint.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 9; 1989, ch. 585, § 16; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 943, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1989, ch. 585, referred to in this section, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13.

Acts 1990, ch. 943, § 2(a) deleted the classification of the prohibited activity in this section as a Class C misdemeanor as classified by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4; 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 24.

Attorney General Opinions. The Registry of Election Finance is not prohibited from considering a sworn statement regarding a legislator's compliance with disclosure and other statutory requirements even if it is not filed by a qualified voter of that legislator's district, OAG 05-022 (3/10/05).

A sworn complaint may be filed with the Registry of Election Finance in relation to a possible violation of the conflict of interest disclosure rules, T.C.A. §§8-50-501 et seq., OAG 05-022 (3/10/05).

An individual is not required to be a registered voter from a legislator's district in order to file a complaint with the Registry of Election Finance concerning that legislator's conduct, OAG 05-023 (3/10/05).

2-10-109. Duties of attorney general and reporter.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter to:

Advise county election commissions, primary boards and administrators of elections of their duties and responsibilities required by this part;

Provide opinions upon the requirements of this part to the members of the general assembly, district attorneys general, the state and county election commissions, and such other officials who are charged with the administration of this law; and

Represent the registry of election finance in any action or lawsuit in any court of this state.

It is the duty of each district attorney general to:

Investigate any sworn complaint filed in accordance with § 2-10-108(c); and

Seek injunctions from the chancery courts of this state to enforce this part against any campaign committee or candidate about whom a sworn complaint has been filed, if such action is justified.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, §§ 4, 10; 1989, ch. 585, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Subdivision (a)(1) of this section was transferred in 1985 from §2-10-103(d).

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4.

2-10-110. Penalties.

The registry of election finance may impose a civil penalty for a violation of this part as provided in this section.

“Class 1 offense” means the late filing of any report or statement required by this part. A Class 1 offense shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day up to a maximum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

For local public offices, the county administrator of elections shall have personally served upon, or send by return receipt requested mail, an assessment letter to any candidate or committee upon the administrator's discovery that a due report has not been filed. The administrator shall forward a copy of such notice to the registry of election finance. For state public offices, the registry of election finance shall have personally served upon, or send by return receipt requested mail, an assessment letter to any candidate or committee upon the registry or its appropriate staff discovering that a due report has not been filed. A civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day shall begin to accrue five (5) days after personal service or receipt of the letter and shall continue to accrue until the report is filed or for thirty (30) days, whichever occurs first; provided, that no civil penalty shall be imposed by the registry of election finance if a candidate fails to list a contribution on a filed report but corrects the omission to the registry's satisfaction within ten (10) business days from the date on which the candidate is served process by, or receives notice from, the registry. This ten-day period shall not serve to stay the running of any time period or reduce any penalty established by this section. A candidate shall only be allowed to correct up to two (2) omissions in one (1) calendar year and the total of the omissions shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000). Any omission corrected by the candidate prior to the registry's discovery of the omission shall not count against the limitation on correction of omissions.

For any Class 1 offense, the registry of election finance, through its appropriate staff, shall send an assessment letter to a candidate or committee in a form sufficient to advise the candidate or committee of the factual basis of the violation, the maximum penalty and the date a response to the letter must be filed. If a disclosure report is returned to a candidate or committee for correction, a copy of the original shall be retained on file until the corrected report is returned to the registry of election finance. If the original filing was in compliance with the intent of the law and minor errors are corrected within the date set for a response, no penalty shall be assessed.

To request a waiver, reduction, or to in any way contest a Class 1 penalty imposed by the registry of election finance, a candidate for a state or local public office shall file a petition with the registry of election finance. Such petition may be considered as a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

“Class 2 offense” means failing to file a report required by this part within thirty-five (35) days after service of process or receipt of notice by registered or certified mail of an assessment or any other violation of the requirements of this part. A Class 2 offense is punishable by a maximum civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or fifteen percent (15%) of the amount in controversy, if fifteen percent (15%) of the amount in controversy is greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

For state and local public offices, the registry of election finance may impose a civil penalty for any Class 2 offense; provided, that no penalty shall be imposed by the registry of election finance if a candidate fails to list a contribution on a filed report but corrects the omission to the registry's satisfaction within ten (10) business days from the date on which the candidate is served process by, or receives notice from, the registry. This ten-day period shall not serve to stay the running of any time period established by this section. A candidate shall only be allowed to correct up to two (2) omissions in one (1) calendar year and the total of the omissions shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000). Any omission corrected by the candidate prior to the registry's discovery of the omission shall not count against the limitation on correction of omissions.

To request a waiver, reduction, or to in any way contest a Class 2 penalty imposed by the registry of election finance, a candidate for a state or local public office shall file a petition with the registry of election finance. Such petition may be considered as a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

“Amount in controversy” means, as appropriate to the case, the greater of the total expenditures or total contributions, either of which or both of which are shown on a late report subsequently filed, or the amount of an expenditure or contribution that was not reported or was incorrectly reported.

Penalties imposed under this part shall be deposited into the state general fund.

The registry of election finance shall maintain a register of all civil penalties imposed under this part and remaining unpaid.

If a civil penalty lawfully assessed and any lawfully assessed cost attendant to the penalty are not paid within thirty (30) days after the assessment becomes final, or by the qualifying deadline for election, whichever is earlier, the candidate owing such civil penalty shall be ineligible to qualify for election to any state or local public office until such penalty and costs are paid.

If a civil penalty authorized by this section is imposed, it shall be considered as a personal judgment against the candidate.

A candidate for state or local public office who fails to file any statement or report required by this part shall be ineligible to qualify for election to any state or local public office until such statement or report is filed with either the registry or the appropriate county election commission, or both.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the sanctions provided in this section shall be the civil penalties enacted into law by Acts 1989, ch. 585.

For any civil penalty levied by the registry against a multicandidate political campaign committee under this section or § 2-10-308, the treasurer of the committee is personally liable for the penalty.

If a civil penalty lawfully assessed and any lawfully assessed cost attendant to the penalty are not paid within thirty (30) days after the assessment becomes final, the multicandidate political campaign committee owing the civil penalty shall be prohibited from receiving contributions; making expenditures to support or oppose candidates; or making expenditures to other multicandidate political campaign committees; and the treasurer and officers of such delinquent multicandidate political campaign committee shall be prohibited from creating another multicandidate political campaign committee or serving as a treasurer or an officer for another multicandidate political campaign committee until such penalty and all costs attendant to the penalty are paid in full.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 11; 1989, ch. 585, § 19; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 943, § 2; 1991, ch. 519, §§ 7-9; 1996, ch. 1005, § 3; 1997, ch. 464, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6; 2007, ch. 151, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1989, ch. 585, referred to in this section, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13.

Acts 1997, ch. 464, § 2 provides that this act shall apply to any conduct that occurs on or after June 13, 1997, leading to the imposition of a penalty.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Curtailing the Cudgel of “Coordination” by Curing Confusion: How States Can Fix What the Feds Got Wrong on Campaign Finance, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 463 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of subsections (c) and (d), OAG 96-149 (12/31/96).

Failure to file conflict of interest disclosure report, OAG 97-134 (9/29/97).

An individual who has an unpaid civil assessment imposed by the registry of election finance or a county election commission that has been final for more than 30 days may not qualify to win election as a write-in candidate and take office, unless the assessment is paid on or before election day, OAG 02-082 (7/19/02).

An individual who has not filed a required disclosure report may not qualify to win election as a write-in candidate and take office, unless the report is filed on or before election day, OAG 02-082 (7/19/02).

Under this section, it is not entirely clear that the Registry of Election Finance may levy a penalty for class 2 offenses against a single-issue political campaign committee; because the Registry has the jurisdiction to administer and enforce disclosure requirements, questions about applicable penalties should be referred first to that agency, OAG 04-135 (8/23/04).

The U.S. Postal Service notation of “unclaimed” may be treated as a refusal to accept delivery and equivalent to service or receipt, whether the letter was sent within Tennessee or out of Tennessee, OAG 04-141 (8/31/04).

2-10-111. Notification of local election by county election commission — Report of compliance with statement filings — Reporting of late filings.

Each county election commission shall notify the state election commission and the registry of election finance of each local election held in that county at the same time that public notice is posted for the election.

Each time that a statement for a candidate for local public office or political campaign committee for a local election is due to be filed with the county election commission under § 2-10-105, the county election commission shall file with the registry of election finance a report certifying that all candidates have filed the report timely or a list of all candidates who have failed to report timely. For each local candidate who is reported to the registry of election finance as filing late, the county election commission shall be required to file, on a form prescribed by the registry, information pertaining to the late filing. The registry shall determine by rule what information from the county election commission shall be necessary. Any changes or revisions to the rules shall be promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1).

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6; 2009, ch. 556, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-10-111 (Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 12; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 4, 7; 1989, ch. 585, § 20; 1990, ch. 943, §§ 5, 6; 1990, ch. 1048, § 4; 1993, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2), concerning inspection of statements and notice to candidate or political campaign committee, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 227, § 1, effective May 27, 2005.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

2-10-112. Application of outstanding balance of campaign account cannot exceed campaign contribution limits.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any candidate who has a previous campaign account with an outstanding balance and who chooses to apply contributions to that previous campaign account, shall not exceed the campaign contribution limits in part 3 of this chapter, for the election cycle during which the candidate accepts the contribution, regardless of whether such candidate applies the amount to the previous campaign account or to the current campaign account. Under no circumstances shall the candidate exceed the contribution limits for the election cycle to which the previous campaign account with an outstanding balance applies.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-10-112 (Acts 1986, ch. 780, § 1), concerning contributions from groups headquartered out of state, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 32.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

2-10-113. Digital currency as campaign contribution.

A candidate or political campaign committee is allowed to accept digital currency as a contribution. Digital currency shall be considered a monetary contribution with the value of the digital currency being the market value of the digital currency at the time the contribution is received.

Any increase in the value of digital currency being held by a candidate or political campaign committee shall be reported as interest on any statement filed pursuant to § 2-10-105.

A candidate or political campaign committee must sell any digital currency and deposit the proceeds from those sales into a campaign account before spending the funds.

Acts 2015, ch. 379, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 379 § 3. April 30, 2015.

2-10-114. Campaign funds — Allocation of unexpended contributions — Use of funds — Specifically prohibited uses of funds — Allocation of funds on death of incumbent or candidate.

Any candidate for public office in this state shall allocate an unexpended balance of contributions after the election to one (1) or a combination of the following:

The funds may be retained or transferred to any campaign fund pursuant to Tennessee reporting requirements;

The funds may be returned to any or all of the candidate's contributors, in accordance with a formula or plan specified in the candidate's disclosure of the allocation;

The funds may be distributed to the executive committee of the candidate's political party;

The funds may be deposited in the volunteer public education trust fund established under title 49, chapter 3, part 4;

The funds may be distributed to any organization described in 26 U.S.C. § 170(c);

The funds may be distributed to an organization that has received a determination of exemption from the United States internal revenue service pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or (4), if such organization is currently operating under such exemption;

The funds may be used to defray any ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the office of the officeholder. Such expenses may include, but are not limited to, the cost of advertisements, membership fees, and donations to community causes; and

The funds may be distributed to any institution of public or private education in the state, for the purpose of supplementing the funds of an existing scholarship trust or program.

Except as provided in subsection (a), no candidate for public office shall use any campaign funds for any other purpose other than a contribution or expenditure as defined by this part. The disbursement of campaign funds for a candidate's own personal use is not permitted. For the purpose of this section, “personal use” means any use by which the candidate for public office or elected public official would be required to treat the amount of the expenditure as gross income under 26 U.S.C. § 61, or any subsequent corresponding Internal Revenue Code section.

Expenditures that are specifically prohibited under this section include, but are not limited to:

Any residential or household items, supplies or expenditures, including mortgage, rent or utility payments for any part of any personal residence of a candidate or officeholder or a member of the candidate's or officeholder's family;

Mortgage, rent, or utility payments for any part of any nonresidential property that is owned by a candidate or officeholder or a member of a candidate's or officeholder's family and used for campaign purposes, to the extent the payments exceed the fair market value of the property usage;

Funeral, cremation, or burial expenses related to deaths within a candidate's or officeholder's family;

Clothing, other than items of de minimis value that are used in the campaign;

Tuition payments within a candidate's or officeholder's family other than those associated with training campaign staff or associated with an officeholder's duties;

Dues, fees, or gratuities at a country club, health club, or recreational facility, unless they are part of a specific fundraising event that takes place on the organization's premises;

Salary payments to a member of a candidate's family, unless the family member is providing bona fide services to the campaign. If a family member provides bona fide services to the campaign, any salary payment in excess of the fair market value of the services provided is a prohibited use;

Admission to a sporting event, concert, theater, activity, charitable event or other form of entertainment, unless the event is an expense associated with a legitimate campaign or officeholder activity, where the tickets to such event are provided to students attending schools, guests or constituents of the candidate or officeholder, or persons involved in the candidate's or officeholder's campaign;

Payments for grooming or enhancing one's personal appearance unrelated to campaign activities; or

Payment of any fines, fees, or penalties assessed pursuant to this chapter or title 3, chapter 6.

A violation of this subsection (b) is a Class 2 offense as defined in § 2-10-110(a)(2).

In addition to the manner in which unexpended balances in the campaign account of a candidate may be allocated under the provisions of subsection (a), if an incumbent dies while in office and has an unexpended balance in a campaign account, and if such incumbent's surviving spouse or child is appointed to fill the unexpired term of the deceased incumbent or is elected to the office previously held by the deceased, then the balance remaining in the campaign account of such deceased incumbent shall be transferred to the campaign account of the surviving spouse or child of the deceased incumbent for use by such surviving spouse or child as a candidate for election to public office in accordance with this part.

In the event a candidate for public office dies with an unexpended balance of contributions in such candidate's campaign account and the provisions of subsection (c) are not applicable, then the following individuals, in the descending order, are authorized to allocate such unexpended balance to those persons, political parties, or charitable organizations listed in subdivisions (a)(2)-(6) and (a)(8):

The deceased candidate, if the candidate provided for allocation of an unexpended balance through the candidate's will;

The deceased candidate's treasurer, unless the candidate was the treasurer;

The surviving spouse of the deceased candidate, if the candidate was the treasurer; and

The next of kin of the deceased candidate, if the provisions of subdivisions (d)(1)(B) and (C) do not apply.

If a decision is not made by any such individual, or individuals where subdivision (d)(1)(D) applies, within one (1) year of the date of death of the deceased candidate, then the unexpended balance shall be distributed by the registry of election finance to the volunteer public education trust fund established under title 49, chapter 3, part 4.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a member of the general assembly raises funds for a local public office during the time the general assembly is in session in accordance with § 2-10-310(a), then any unexpended balance of contributions in the campaign account established by that member of the general assembly for the member's candidacy for local public office shall not be used for or distributed to a campaign fund:

For the benefit of any election for any candidate for the general assembly;

For the benefit of any statewide election, or any state, national or other political party;

For the benefit of any state, national or other political party caucus; or

For the benefit of any state, national or other political party caucus member.

Acts 1992, ch. 932, § 1; 2001, ch. 384, § 1; 2002, ch. 470, § 2; 2002, ch. 600, § 1; 2005, ch. 163, §§ 3, 4; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8; 2011, ch. 389, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Transfer of funds or assets from federal to state election campaign committee prohibited, §2-10-119.

Attorney General Opinions. 1990 and 1992 campaigns, reporting requirements, OAG 94-034 (3/18/94).

Application to pre-1993 campaigns, scope of disclosure, OAG 94-035 (3/18/94).

Use of contributions for legal expenses, OAG 97-146 (10/23/97).

Surplus campaign funds of deceased candidate for state or local office, OAG 99-118 (5/14/99).

Candidate may not transfer debt properly attributable to an earlier election cycle to a later election account and use contributions collected during the later election cycle to pay off the outstanding debts from the earlier campaign, OAG 03-089 (7/15/03).

Candidate may not use campaign funds to pay civil penalties assessed by the registry of election finance, OAG 05-100 (6/20/05).

Use of campaign funds for legislative trip, OAG 05-166 (10/31/05).

2-10-115. Disclosure of income, positions and trusts by the governor, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, treasurer, governor's cabinet, cabinet level staff, or their spouses — Posting of information — Form.

The governor, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, treasurer, any member of the governor's cabinet, cabinet level staff, and those persons' spouses shall report annually to the Tennessee ethics commission prior to April 15 the following information for the prior calendar year:

The major source or sources of private income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), including, but not limited to, offices, directorships, and salaried employments of the person making disclosure, but no dollar amounts need be stated. The disclosure shall state the name and address of any entity that provides a source of private income of more than two hundred dollars ($200). This subdivision (a)(1) shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any client list or customer list, nor the address of any investment property. When reporting private income received from a security listed on the New York Stock Exchange, American Stock Exchange or the Nasdaq, the disclosure may state only the name of the entity, in lieu of disclosing the name and address of the entity. If a person listed in subsection (a) or their spouse's ownership of a business enterprise's securities provides income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), then the business enterprise shall be named in lieu of any investment brokerage firm or other fiduciary that may possess or manage the securities on behalf of such person or spouse. If a person listed in subsection (a) or their spouse's ownership of shares of a mutual fund provides income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), then the mutual fund shall be named in lieu of the business enterprises whose securities are owned by the mutual fund. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), income shall be reported for the calendar year in which it is received. When reporting private income received from investments with a federal or state chartered bank, the disclosure may state only the name of the bank, in lieu of stating the name and address of the bank;

Any positions held during the applicable reporting period, including, but not limited to, those of an officer, director, trustee, general partner, proprietor, or representative of any corporation, firm, partnership, or other business enterprise, or any nonprofit organization or educational institution. Both the year and month shall be reported for the period of time the position was held. Positions with the federal government, religious, social, fraternal, or political entities, and those solely of an honorary nature do not require disclosure; and

Any trust considered to be a “blind trust” pursuant to § 35-50-120 to which a person listed in subsection (a) or their spouse is an interested party. The person making disclosure shall state that the person is an interested party to a blind trust and provide the name and address of the trustee of the trust. Notwithstanding any provisions of this subdivision (a)(3) to the contrary, the person making disclosure is not required to disclose any individual asset held in a blind trust.

The reports in subsection (a) shall be posted on the web site of the Tennessee ethics commission. The Tennessee ethics commission shall modify existing forms to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The commission shall create a consolidated form that collects the information required to be reported by this section and § 8-50-502. Any person, who is required to disclose information pursuant to this section and § 8-50-501, who files the consolidated form in a manner that complies with the requirements of those sections, shall fulfill the requirements of this section and § 8-50-501. Filing the consolidated form prior to April 15 as required by this section shall also fulfill the requirements of §§ 8-50-503 and 8-50-504.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 932 and Acts 1992, ch. 978 enacted identical sections, which were originally codified as §§2-10-114 and2-10-115. In light of the codification of §2-10-114, the code commission deems §2-10-115 unnecessary and has instructed the compiler to remove it from the code.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

2-10-116. Honorarium defined — Acceptance of honorarium by public official.

The acceptance of an honorarium by a public official in such person's capacity as a public official is prohibited. “Honorarium” means a payment of money or any thing of value for an appearance, speech or article, but does not include actual and necessary travel expenses, meals and lodging associated with such appearance, speech or article.

Acceptance of an honorarium for an appearance, speech or article by a public official in such person's capacity as a private business person, professional or tradesperson is not prohibited.

As used in this section, “public official” means:

Each person holding any state public office filled by the voters;

Each person holding any local public office filled by the voters;

Each member of the governor's cabinet; and

Each cabinet level staff person employed within the governor's office.

Acts 1992, ch. 978, § 4; 2006, ch. 545, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §2-10-116 supersedes Canons 4.B and 4.H of the Code of Judicial Conduct contained in Tennessee Supreme Court Rule 10 and prohibits an elected general sessions judge from accepting honoraria for lecturing about the creation and history of the judge's specialized court and assisting other counties and cities in establishing such courts, OAG 02-004 (1/2/02).

2-10-117. Contributions from political action committees within ten days of election.

No multicandidate political campaign committee other than a committee controlled by a political party on the national, state, or local level or by a caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general assembly shall make a contribution to any candidate after the tenth day before an election until the day of the election.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 10; 2009, ch. 319, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 17 provided that that act shall only apply to contributions and expenditures made after January 1, 1996.